Louisiana, session 2026, HB713.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3160(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 34:3160.1 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3160. Rights and powers of commission
* * *
B. The commission may authorize a reasonable travel allowance for its
members in the performance of their official duties. It may employ such officers,
agents, and employees as it finds necessary in the performance of its duties and may
prescribe the duties, powers, and compensation of such officers, agents and
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-277 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 713
employees. The commission shall determine the salary and establish the terms of
employment for the executive port director. No contract, amendment, or renewal
executed on or after January 1, 2028, shall authorize a total compensation that
exceeds the average total compensation established pursuant to R.S. 34:3160.1. The
commission, on such terms as it agrees upon, may contract for legal, financial,
engineering, and other professional services necessary or expedient in the conduct
of its affairs, and, on terms and conditions mutually agreeable, may utilize the
services of the executive departments of the state.
* * *
§3160.1. Executive port director; average total compensation
A. As used in this Section, "total compensation" means the aggregate value
of all forms of remuneration provided to the executive port director by the
commission, including base salary, allowances, benefits, bonuses, incentives,
deferred compensation, and any other monetary or nonmonetary compensation.
B.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the total
compensation of the executive port director of the Caddo-Bossier Parishes Port
Commission shall not exceed the statewide average total compensation paid to
executive port directors of the top ten port authorities and port commissions in
Louisiana.
(2) The statewide average total compensation shall be calculated annually
by the legislative auditor and the division of administration, using the most recent
and reliable compensation data available. The calculation shall include the mean of
the total compensation figures for the executive port directors of the top ten port
authorities and port commissions. Vacancies or incomplete data shall be treated in
a manner that ensures accurate representation of statewide compensation levels.
(3) Each port authority and port commission in the state shall submit annual
compensation data for its executive port director to the legislative auditor and the
division of administration who shall be responsible for calculating the statewide
average pursuant to Subsection C of this Section. The data shall be submitted no
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-277 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 713
later than ninety days following the end of the commission's fiscal year and shall be
provided in a standardized format prescribed by the legislative auditor and the
division of administration.
D.(1) Upon the effective date of this Act, the legislative auditor and the
division of administration shall immediately begin the necessary steps to calculate
the mean total compensation of executive port directors of the top ten port authorities
and port commissioners statewide as provided in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section.
The initial determination of the mean total compensation shall be determined no later
than January 1, 2027 to ensure adequate time for the Caddo-Bossier Parishes Port
Commission to comply with Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2028, the average total compensation established
in this Section shall apply to the compensation package of the executive port director
of the Caddo-Bossier Parishes Port Commission. No contract, amendment, or
renewal executed on or after that date shall authorize a total compensation package
in excess of the average total compensation established in this Section.
E. This Section shall not be construed to create any enforcement mechanism
or penalty. It is the intent of the legislature that the commission adhere to the
average total compensation established in this Section in the ordinary course of its
professional and administrative practices.
Section 2. The provisions contained in this Act shall apply prospectively only and
shall not be construed to impair the obligations of any existing lawful contract that is in
effect as of the effective date of this Act. Any current employment contract shall remain
enforceable in accordance with its terms until it expires, is amended, or is renewed.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-277 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 713